trunk/apertium-es-ro/apertium-es-ro.es.dix
   <pardef n="let/ón__n">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>onas</l>
          <r>ón<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ona</l>
          <r>ón<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ones</l>
          <r>ón<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ón</l>
          <r>ón<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

 <pardef n="muert/o_de_hambre__adj">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>as<b/>de<b/>hambre</l>
          <r>o<b/>de<b/>hambre<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a<b/>de<b/>hambre</l>
          <r>o<b/>de<b/>hambre<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>os<b/>de<b/>hambre</l>
          <r>o<b/>de<b/>hambre<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o<b/>de<b/>hambre</l>
          <r>o<b/>de<b/>hambre<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="anch/o_de_espaldas__adj">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>as<b/>de<b/>espaldas</l>
          <r>o<b/>de<b/>espaldas<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a<b/>de<b/>espaldas</l>
          <r>o<b/>de<b/>espaldas<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>os<b/>de<b/>espaldas</l>
          <r>o<b/>de<b/>espaldas<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o<b/>de<b/>espaldas</l>
          <r>o<b/>de<b/>espaldas<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

   <pardef n="cargad/o_de_espaldas__adj">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>as<b/>de<b/>espaldas</l>
          <r>o<b/>de<b/>espaldas<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a<b/>de<b/>espaldas</l>
          <r>o<b/>de<b/>espaldas<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>os<b/>de<b/>espaldas</l>
          <r>o<b/>de<b/>espaldas<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o<b/>de<b/>espaldas</l>
          <r>o<b/>de<b/>espaldas<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

 <pardef n="anch/o_de_hombros__adj">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>as<b/>de<b/>hombros</l>
          <r>o<b/>de<b/>hombros<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a<b/>de<b/>hombros</l>
          <r>o<b/>de<b/>hombros<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>os<b/>de<b/>hombros</l>
          <r>o<b/>de<b/>hombros<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o<b/>de<b/>hombros</l>
          <r>o<b/>de<b/>hombros<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

<pardef n="anch/o_de_pecho__adj">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>as<b/>de<b/>pecho</l>
          <r>o<b/>de<b/>pecho<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a<b/>de<b/>pecho</l>
          <r>o<b/>de<b/>pecho<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>os<b/>de<b/>pecho</l>
          <r>o<b/>de<b/>pecho<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o<b/>de<b/>pecho</l>
          <r>o<b/>de<b/>pecho<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

 <pardef n="borrach/o_como_una_cuba__adj">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>as<b/>como<b/>una<b/>cuba</l>
          <r>o<b/>como<b/>una<b/>cuba<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a<b/>como<b/>una<b/>cuba</l>
          <r>o<b/>como<b/>una<b/>cuba<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>os<b/>como<b/>una<b/>cuba</l>
          <r>o<b/>como<b/>una<b/>cuba<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o<b/>como<b/>una<b/>cuba</l>
          <r>o<b/>como<b/>una<b/>cuba<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="adem/án__n">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anes</l>
          <r>án<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>án</l>
          <r>án<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="comp/ás__n">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ases</l>
          <r>ás<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ás</l>
          <r>ás<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="r/égimen__n">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>egímenes</l>
          <r>égimen<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>égimen</l>
          <r>égimen<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

 <pardef n="esp/écimen__n">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ecímenes</l>
          <r>écimen<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>écimen</l>
          <r>écimen<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="sart/én__n">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>enes</l>
          <r>én<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>én</l>
          <r>én<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="almac/én__n">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>enes</l>
          <r>én<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>én</l>
          <r>én<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="reh/én__n">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>enes</l>
          <r>én<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>én</l>
          <r>én<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="h/éroe__n">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eroínas</l>
          <r>éroe<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eroína</l>
          <r>éroe<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>éroes</l>
          <r>éroe<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>éroe</l>
          <r>éroe<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="aragon/és__n">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>esas</l>
          <r>és<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>esa</l>
          <r>és<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eses</l>
          <r>és<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>és</l>
          <r>és<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

     <e lm="muerto de hambre">
        <i>muert</i>
        <par n="muert/o_de_hambre__adj"/>
      </e>
       <e lm="ancho de espaldas">
        <i>anch</i>
        <par n="anch/o_de_espaldas__adj"/>
      </e>
       <e lm="ancho de hombros">
        <i>anch</i>
        <par n="anch/o_de_hombros__adj"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="borracho como una cuba">
        <i>borrach</i>
        <par n="borrach/o_como_una_cuba__adj"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="ancho de pecho">
        <i>anch</i>
        <par n="anch/o_de_pecho__adj"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="cargado de espaldas">
        <i>cargad</i>
        <par n="cargad/o_de_espaldas__adj"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="ademán">
        <i>adem</i>
        <par n="adem/án__n"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="afán">
        <i>af</i>
        <par n="adem/án__n"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="letón">
        <i>let</i>
        <par n="let/ón__n"/>
      </e>
     <e lm="mormón">
        <i>morm</i>
        <par n="let/ón__n"/>
      </e>
       <e lm="santurrón">
        <i>santurr</i>
        <par n="let/ón__n"/>
      </e>
     <e lm="lapón">
        <i>lap</i>
        <par n="let/ón__n"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="teutón">
        <i>teut</i>
        <par n="let/ón__n"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="almacén">
        <i>almac</i>
        <par n="almac/én__n"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="amén">
        <i>am</i>
        <par n="almac/én__n"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="andén">
        <i>and</i>
        <par n="almac/én__n"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="arcén">
        <i>arc</i>
        <par n="almac/én__n"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="badén" r="LR">
        <i>bad</i>
        <par n="almac/én__n"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="capellán">
        <i>capell</i>
        <par n="adem/án__n"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="gabán" a="mioara">
        <i>gab</i>
        <par n="adem/án__n"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="catamarán">
        <i>catamar</i>
        <par n="adem/án__n"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="chaflán">
        <i>chafl</i>
        <par n="adem/án__n"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="champán">
        <i>champ</i>
        <par n="adem/án__n"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="compás">
        <i>comp</i>
        <par n="comp/ás__n"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="congolés" r="LR">
        <i>congol</i>
        <par n="aragon/és__n"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="desdén">
        <i>desd</i>
        <par n="almac/én__n"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="desmán">
        <i>desm</i>
        <par n="adem/án__n"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="feligrés">
        <i>feligr</i>
        <par n="aragon/és__n"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="francés">
        <i>franc</i>
        <par n="aragon/és__n"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="albanés">
        <i>alban</i>
        <par n="aragon/és__n"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="héroe">
        <i>h</i>
        <par n="h/éroe__n"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="imán">
        <i>im</i>
        <par n="adem/án__n"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="inglés">
        <i>ingl</i>
        <par n="aragon/és__n"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="japonés">
        <i>japon</i>
        <par n="aragon/és__n"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="libanés">
        <i>liban</i>
        <par n="aragon/és__n"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="pequinés">
        <i>pequin</i>
        <par n="aragon/és__n"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="rehén">
        <i>reh</i>
        <par n="reh/én__n"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="régimen">
        <i>r</i>
        <par n="r/égimen__n"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="espécimen">
        <i>esp</i>
        <par n="esp/écimen__n"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="sartén">
        <i>sart</i>
        <par n="sart/én__n"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="terraplén">
        <i>terrapl</i>
        <par n="sart/én__n"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="talismán">
        <i>talism</i>
        <par n="adem/án__n"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="vienés" a="mioara">
        <i>vien</i>
        <par n="aragon/és__n"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="escocés" a="mioara">
        <i>escoc</i>
        <par n="aragon/és__n"/>
      </e>
<e lm="edén" a="delia">
  <i>ed</i>
  <par n="almac/én__n"/>
</e>
<e lm="cruasán" a="mioara">
  <i>cruas</i>
  <par n="adem/án__n"/>
</e>
